Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8.10 Long-Term Care Service Reform for Medicaid Eligible Individuals

40-8.10-1.
Purpose.

In order to ensure that all Medicaid recipients eligible for long-term care have access to the full continuum of services they need, the secretary of the executive office of health and human services, in collaboration with the directors of EOHHS departments, shall offer eligible Medicaid recipients the full range of services as allowed under the terms and conditions of the Rhode Island Medicaid section 1115 demonstration waiver, including institutional services and the home- and community-based services provided for under the previous Medicaid section 1915(c) waivers, as well as additional services for medication management, transition services, and other authorized services as defined in this chapter, in order to meet the individual needs of the Medicaid recipient.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 9; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 17.

40-8.10-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Core services” mean homemaker services, environmental modifications (home accessibility adaptations, special medical equipment (minor assistive devices), meals on wheels (home delivered meals), personal emergency response (PERS), licensed practical nurse services, community transition services, residential supports, day supports, supported employment, supported living arrangements, private duty nursing, supports for consumer direction (supports facilitation), participant directed goods and services, case management, senior companion services, assisted living, personal care assistance services and respite.

“Preventive services” mean homemaker services, minor environmental modifications, physical therapy evaluation and services, and respite services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 9.

40-8.10-3.
Levels of care.

The secretary of the executive office of health and human services shall coordinate responsibilities for long-term-care assessment in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Importance shall be placed upon the proper and consistent determination of levels of care across the state departments for each long-term-care setting, including behavioral health residential treatment facilities, long-term-care hospitals, intermediate-care facilities, and/or skilled nursing facilities. Specialized plans of care that meet the needs of the individual Medicaid recipients shall be coordinated and consistent across all state departments. The development of care plans shall be person-centered and shall support individual self-determination, family involvement, when appropriate, individual choice, and interdepartmental collaboration.

Levels of care for long-term-care institutions (behavioral health residential treatment facilities, long-term-care hospitals, intermediate-care facilities and/or skilled nursing facilities), for which alternative community-based services and supports are available, shall be established pursuant to §

40-8.9-9

. The structure of the three (3) levels of care is as follows:

Highest level of care. Individuals who are determined, based on medical need, to require the institutional level of care will have the choice to receive services in a long-term-care institution or in a home- and community-based setting.

High level of care. Individuals who are determined, based on medical need, to benefit from home- and community-based services.

Preventive level of care. Individuals who do not presently need an institutional level of care but who need services targeted at preventing admission, re-admissions, or reducing lengths of stay in an institution.

Determinations of levels of care and the provision of long-term-care health services shall be determined in accordance with this section and shall be in accordance with the applicable provisions of §

40-8.9-9

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 9; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 17.

40-8.10-4.
Long-term care assessment and coordination.

The executive office of health and human services shall implement a long-term-care-options counseling program to provide individuals or their representative, or both, with long-term-care consultations that shall include, at a minimum, information about long-term-care options, sources and methods of both public and private payment for long-term-care services; information on caregiver support services, including respite care; and an assessment of an individual’s functional capabilities and opportunities for maximizing independence. Each individual admitted to or seeking admission to a long-term-care facility, regardless of the payment source, shall be informed by the facility of the availability of the long-term-care-options counseling program and shall be provided with a long-term-care-options consultation, if he or she so requests. Each individual who applies for Medicaid long-term-care services shall be provided with a long-term-care consultation.

Core and preventative home- and community-based services defined and delineated in §

40-8.10-2

shall be provided only to those individuals who meet one of the levels of care provided for in this chapter. Other long-term-care services authorized by the federal government, such as medication management, may also be provided to Medicaid-eligible recipients who have established the requisite need.

The assessments for individuals conducted in accordance with this section shall serve as the basis for individual budgets for those medical assistance recipients eligible to receive services utilizing a self-directed delivery system.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the secretary of the executive office of health and human services, or the directors of that office’s departments from utilizing community agencies or contractors when appropriate to perform assessment functions outlined in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 9; P.L. 2013, ch. 457, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 469, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 17.

40-8.10-5.
Payments.

The executive office of health and human services shall not make payment for a person receiving a long-term home healthcare program, while payments are being made for that person for inpatient care in a skilled nursing and/or intermediate-care facility or hospital.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 9; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 17.

40-8.10-6.
Rules and regulations.

The secretary of the executive office of health and human services, the directors of the department of human services, the office of healthy aging, the department of children, youth and families and the department of behavioral healthcare, development disabilities and hospitals are hereby authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement all provisions of this chapter and to seek necessary federal approvals in accordance with the provisions of the state’s Medicaid section 1115 demonstration waiver.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 9; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 17.